Montana, session 2025, HB710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Issuance of subpoena by certain officers -- definition. (1) When an
internet crimes against children task force officer has a duty to investigate an offense that involves the sexual
exploitation of a minor, a justice of the supreme court or a district court judge of this state may cause
subpoenas to be issued commanding the persons to whom they are directed to appear before the internet
crimes against children task force officer and give testimony and produce books, records, papers, documents,
and other objects as may be necessary and proper to the investigation.
(2) A subpoena under this section may be issued only when it relates to an investigation of an
offense that involves the sexual exploitation of a minor and it appears on the affidavit of the internet crimes
against children task force officer that the administration of justice requires it to be issued.
(3) A subpoena under this section may require the production of the following records or other
documentation relevant to the investigation:
(a) name of an account holder;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 710

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0710.2
(b) billing and service address;
(c) electronic mail address;
(d) internet user name;
(e) telephone number;
(f) internet protocol address;
(g) account status;
(h) source of payment for the service, including a credit card or bank account number;
(i) method of access to the internet; and
(j) automatic number identification records, if internet access is by modem.
(4) For the purposes of this section, "internet crimes against children task force officer" means a
peace officer, as defined in 45-2-101, who is assigned to the internet crimes against children task force that is
located in the state and recognized by the United States department of justice.


Section 2. Section 3-1-1101, MCA, is amended to read:

"3-1-1101. Creation and composition of commission -- ALLOCATION .. (1) There is created a judicial
standards commission consisting of five members as follows:

(a) two district court judges appointed by the speaker of the house as provided in 3-1-1115 and
confirmed by the senate;
(b) one attorney who has practiced law in this state for at least 10 years, appointed by the attorney
general and confirmed by the senate; and
(c) two citizens who are not attorneys or judges of any court, active or retired, appointed by the
governor and confirmed by the senate.
(2) Members shall serve staggered 4-year terms.

(3) The judicial standards commission is allocated to the department of justice for administrative
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 710

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0710.2
purposes only as prescribed in 2-15-121. However, the commission may hire its own personnel, and 2-15-
121(2)(d) does not apply.
(4) The judicial standards commission shall exercise its functions independently of the department
and without approval or control of the department.
(5) A district court judge may not serve as the presiding officer of the commission."

Section 3 .. Section 3-2-701, MCA, is amended to read:

"3-2-701. Power of court over rules -- DEFERENCE TO LEGISLATIVE ACTS .. (1) The supreme court of
this state shall have the power to may regulate the pleading, practice, and procedure, and the forms thereof of
these, in civil actions in all courts of this state by rules promulgated by it the supreme court from time to time for
the purpose of simplifying judicial proceedings in the courts of Montana and for promoting the speedy
determination of litigation upon on its merits. Such The rules shall may not abridge, enlarge, or modify the
substantive rights of any litigant and shall may not be inconsistent with the constitution of the state of Montana.
(2) Except in cases in which the state constitution explicitly mandates a different standard of
review, if in a proceeding before a Montana court a party challenges a state legislative act as violative of the
state constitution, the supreme court shall uphold the legislative act unless the challenger demonstrates that the
legislative act is unconstitutional beyond a reasonable doubt."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 46, chapter 4, and the provisions of Title 46, chapter 4, apply to [section 1].


NEW SECTION. Section 5 .. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications ..

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective dates DATE. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3),
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 710

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0710.2
[t his [THIS act] is effective October 1, 2025.

(2) [Section 1] and this section are effective on passage and approval.

(3) [Section 2] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 710